District of Columbia statutes.
5-131.05

Appropriations.

Appropriations to carry out the purpose of this subchapter is hereby authorized.

History

July 11, 1947, 61 Stat. 311, ch. 226, § 5
Sept. 22, 1959, 73 Stat. 641, Pub. L. 86-356
Aug. 16, 1971, 85 Stat. 343, Pub. L. 92-124, § 1(3)

Cross References

Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-183.
1973 Ed., § 4-184.